Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 5.5.
Roanoke River Basin Bi-State Commission.

Sec.

62.1-69.36. Definitions.

62.1-69.37. Roanoke River Basin Bi-State Commission established; purpose.

62.1-69.38. Membership; terms.

62.1-69.39. Roanoke River Basin Bi-State Commission powers and duties.

62.1-69.40. Standing and ad hoc committees.

62.1-69.41. Staffing and support.

62.1-69.42. Funding.

62.1-69.43. Compensation and expenses.

62.1-69.44. Annual report required.

§ 62.1-69.36. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

"Basin"
means the Roanoke River Basin.

"Roanoke River Basin"
means that land area designated as the Roanoke River Basin by the Virginia State Water Control Board, pursuant to §

62.1-44.38

, and the North Carolina Department of Environment and Natural Resources.

(Acts 2002, cc. 657, 843; 2003, c. 885.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2002, cc. 657 and 843, each enacted sections relating to the Roanoke River Basin. Chapter 657 placed these sections as a new Chapter 5.4 of Title 62.1, while c. 843 placed them in new Chapters 5.4 and 5.5 of Title 62.1. Many but not all of the sections were identical. Subsequently, Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 3 repealed Acts 2002, c. 657.

Acts 2002, c. 843, cl. 2, provides: "That the provisions of this act pertaining to the State of North Carolina, including its participation in, funding for, and responsibilities to the Roanoke River Bi-State Commission, shall become effective upon the date of enactment of a comparable act establishing the Roanoke River Basin Bi-State Commission by the General Assembly of North Carolina."

Acts 2002, c. 843, cl. 3, provides: "That, upon the effective date of this act, the Virginia Roanoke River Basin Advisory Committee shall organize and commence its work."

Acts 2002, c. 843, cl. 4, provides: "That, upon the decision of the General Assembly of North Carolina not to enact or to repeal comparable legislation establishing the Roanoke River Bi-State Commission, the Virginia Roanoke River Basin Advisory Committee shall assume the powers and duties of the Roanoke River Basin Bi-State Commission, in accordance with

§

62.1-69.39

."

The 2003 amendments.

- Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 4, repealed Acts 2002, c. 657. See the Editor's note at

§

62.1-69.34

.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 20 M.J. Waters and Watercourses,

§

3.

§ 62.1-69.37. Roanoke River Basin Bi-State Commission established; purpose.

The Roanoke River Basin Bi-State Commission is hereby established as a bi-state commission composed of members from the Commonwealth of Virginia and the State of North Carolina and hereinafter referred to as the Commission. The Commission shall:

Provide guidance, conduct joint meetings, and make recommendations to local, state and federal legislative and administrative bodies, and to others as it deems necessary and appropriate, regarding the use, stewardship, and enhancement of the Basin's water and other natural resources;

Provide a forum for discussion of issues affecting the Basin's water quantity, water quality, and other natural resources;

Promote communication, coordination and education among stakeholders within the Basin;

Identify Basin-related problems and recommend appropriate solutions; and

Undertake studies and prepare, publish, and disseminate information through reports, and other communications, related to water quantity, water quality and other natural resources of the Basin.

(2002, cc. 657, 843; 2003, c. 885, cl. 4.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 4, repealed Acts 2002, c. 657. See the Editor's note at

§

62.1-69.34

.

§ 62.1-69.38. Membership; terms.

The Commission shall be composed of 18 voting members that include nine members representing the Commonwealth of Virginia and nine members representing the State of North Carolina. The Virginia delegation shall consist of the six legislative members appointed to the Virginia Roanoke River Basin Advisory Committee, and three nonlegislative citizen members appointed to the Virginia Roanoke River Basin Advisory Committee, who represent different geographical areas of the Virginia portion of the Roanoke River Basin, to be appointed by the Governor of Virginia. The North Carolina delegation to the Commission shall be appointed as determined by the State of North Carolina. All members appointed to the Commission by the Commonwealth of Virginia and the State of North Carolina shall reside within the Basin's watershed. Members of the Virginia House of Delegates and the Senate of Virginia, the North Carolina House of Representatives and Senate, and federal legislators, who have not been appointed to the Commission and whose districts include any portion of the Basin, shall serve as nonvoting ex officio members of the Commission.

Legislative members of the Virginia delegation, federal legislators, and local government officials, whether appointed or ex officio, shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Nonlegislative citizen members shall be appointed to serve two-year terms, unless the member is reappointed by the appointing authorities of each state. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be made for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

Each state's delegation to the Commission may meet separately to discuss Basin-related issues affecting their state, and may report their findings independently of the Commission. A majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum.

(2002, cc. 657, 843; 2003, c. 885.)

Editor's note.

- Section

62.1-69.38

is set out above as enacted by Acts 2002, c. 843. A corresponding section was enacted by Acts 2002, c. 657 and numbered

§

62.1-69.37

. Subsequently, Acts 2002, c. 657 was repealed by Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 4.

Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 7, provides: "That all current members of the collegial bodies whose terms have been modified by this act shall be eligible, if reappointed, to the full number of terms provided by this act regardless of prior service."

Effect of amendment.

- The 2003 amendment by c. 885, cl. 1, rewrote subsections A and B, and in subsection C, added the second sentence.

Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 4, repealed Acts 2002, c. 657. See the Editor's note at

§

62.1-69.34

.

§ 62.1-69.39. Roanoke River Basin Bi-State Commission powers and duties.

The Commission shall have no regulatory authority.

To perform its duties and objectives, the Commission shall have the power to:

Develop rules and procedures for the conduct of its business or as may be necessary to perform its duties and carry out its objectives, including, but not limited to, selecting a chairman and vice-chairman, rotating chairmanships, calling meetings and establishing voting procedures. Rules and procedures developed pursuant to this subdivision shall be effective upon an affirmative vote by a majority of the Commission members;

Establish standing and ad hoc advisory committees, which shall be constituted in a manner to ensure a balance between recognized interests. The purpose of each advisory committee shall be determined by the Commission;

Seek, apply for, accept and expend gifts, grants and donations, services and other aid from public or private sources. With the exception of funds provided by the planning district commissions and funds appropriated by the General Assemblies of Virginia and North Carolina, the Commission may accept funds only after an affirmative vote by a majority of the members of the Commission or by following such other procedures as may be established by the Commission for the conduct of its business;

Establish a nonprofit corporation to assist in the details of administering its affairs and in raising funds;

Enter into contracts and execute all instruments necessary or appropriate; and

Perform any lawful acts necessary or appropriate for the furtherance of its work.

(2002, cc. 657, 843; 2003, c. 885.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2002, c. 843, cl. 4, provides: "That, upon the decision of the General Assembly of North Carolina not to enact or to repeal comparable legislation establishing the Roanoke River Bi-State Commission, the Virginia Roanoke River Basin Advisory Committee shall assume the powers and duties of the Roanoke River Basin Bi-State Commission, in accordance with

§

62.1-69.39

."

Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 4, repealed Acts 2002, c. 657. See the Editor's note at

§

62.1-69.34

.

§ 62.1-69.40. Standing and ad hoc committees.

To facilitate communication among stakeholders in the Roanoke River Basin, and to maximize participation by all interested parties, the Commission shall establish both standing and ad hoc committees. The Commission shall appoint the members of the standing and ad hoc committees, in accordance with guidelines adopted by the Commission. The standing committees shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Permit holders. The Commission shall identify those entities that hold permits issued by a federal, state or local regulatory agency pertaining to the water of the Basin. Such entities may recommend a representative to be appointed to the committee by the Commission;

Roanoke River Basin interest groups. The Commission shall identify interest groups that may recommend a representative to be appointed to the committee by the Commission;

Public officials and government entities. The committee shall be composed of representatives of each county, city and town located completely or partially within the Basin, and any other governmental entities that the Commission deems appropriate may recommend one member to be appointed to the committee by the Commission. The committee may also include the U.S. Senators from Virginia and North Carolina or their designees, and any member of the U.S. House of Representatives or his designee, whose district includes any portion of the Basin, if such members elect to serve on the committee; and

Agriculture, forestry and soil and water conservation districts. The Commission shall identify persons who represent agricultural and forestry interests throughout the Basin and representatives from the soil and water conservation districts within the Basin and shall appoint representatives from these groups to the committee.

(2002, cc. 657, 843; 2003, c. 885.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 4, repealed Acts 2002, c. 657. See the Editor's note at

§

62.1-69.34

.

§ 62.1-69.41. Staffing and support.

The Virginia Department of Environmental Quality and the North Carolina Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall provide staff support to the Commission. Additional staff may be hired or contracted by the Commission through funds raised by or provided to it. The duties and compensation of such additional staff shall be determined and fixed by the Commission, within available resources.

All agencies of the Commonwealth of Virginia and the State of North Carolina shall cooperate with the Commission and, upon request, shall assist the Commission in fulfilling its responsibilities. The Virginia Secretary of Natural Resources and the North Carolina Secretary of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources or their designees shall each serve as the liaison between their respective state agencies and the Commission.

(2002, cc. 657, 843; 2003, c. 885.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 4, repealed Acts 2002, c. 657. See the Editor's note at

§

62.1-69.34

.

§ 62.1-69.42. Funding.

The Commission shall annually adopt a budget, which shall include the Commission's estimated expenses. Funding for the Commission shall be shared and apportioned between the Commonwealth of Virginia and the State of North Carolina. The appropriation of public funds to the Commission shall be provided through each state's regular process for appropriating public funds. The Virginia planning district commissions within the Basin shall bear a proportion of Virginia's share of the expenses, which may be in the form of in-kind contributions.

The Commission shall designate a fiscal agent.

The accounts and records of the Commission showing the receipt and disbursement of funds from whatever source derived shall be in such form as the Virginia Auditor of Public Accounts and the North Carolina State Auditor prescribe, provided that such accounts shall correspond as nearly as possible to the accounts and records for such matters maintained by similar enterprises. The accounts and records of the Commission shall be subject to an annual audit by the Virginia Auditor of Public Accounts and the North Carolina State Auditor or their legal representatives, and the costs of such audit services shall be borne by the Commission. The results of the audits shall be delivered to the appropriate legislative oversight committees in each state.

(2002, cc. 657, 843; 2003, c. 885.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 4, repealed Acts 2002, c. 657. See the Editor's note at

§

62.1-69.34

.

§ 62.1-69.43. Compensation and expenses.

Legislative members of the Virginia delegation to the Commission shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12, and nonlegislative members shall receive such compensation for the performance of their duties as provided in §

2.2-2813

. All voting members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in § §

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. However, all such expenses shall be paid from existing appropriations and funds provided to the Commission or, if unfunded, shall be approved by the Joint Rules Committee.

Members of the Virginia House of Delegates and the Senate of Virginia, and members of the Virginia Congressional delegation, who have not been appointed to the Commission, whose districts include any portion of the Basin, and who serve as nonvoting ex officio members of the Commission shall serve without compensation and expenses.

Nonlegislative citizen members appointed to any standing committees or ad hoc committees shall serve without compensation and expenses.

The North Carolina members of the Commission shall receive per diem, subsistence, and travel expenses as follows:

Ex officio legislative members who are members of the General Assembly at the rate established in North Carolina G.S. 138-6;

Commission members who are officials or employees of the State or of local government agencies at the rate established in North Carolina G.S. 138-6; and

All other members at the rate established in North Carolina G.S. 138-5.

(2002, cc. 657, 843; 2003, c. 885.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 7, provides: "That all current members of the collegial bodies whose terms have been modified by this act shall be eligible, if reappointed, to the full number of terms provided by this act regardless of prior service."

Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 4, repealed Acts 2002, c. 657. See the Editor's note at

§

62.1-69.34

.

The 2003 amendments.

- The 2003 amendment by c. 885, cl. 1, rewrote the first paragraph of subsection A and added the second and third paragraphs.

§ 62.1-69.44. Annual report required.

The Commission shall submit an annual report, including any recommendations, to the Governor and General Assembly of Virginia and the Governor and General Assembly of North Carolina.

(2002, cc. 657, 843; 2003, c. 885.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 4, repealed Acts 2002, c. 657. See the Editor's note at

§

62.1-69.34

.